Washington statutes.
RCW 15.37.030

Minimum conditions for sale, etc.—When license required—Expiration date of license.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, offer for sale, hold for sale, or advertise for sale, trade, barter, or to give as an inducement for the sale of another product, milk, cream, or skim milk, for animal food consumption, which does not meet, or has not been produced and handled under conditions prescribed for grade A milk as provided in chapter 15.36 RCW as enacted or hereafter amended, without first obtaining an annual license from the director which shall expire on June 30th following the date of issuance unless revoked prior thereto by the director for cause.

[ 1961 c 285 s 3.]